District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.16a

Tenant representation by tenant organization.

(a)

A tenant organization shall have standing to assert a claim in its name on behalf of one or more of its members in any petition filed pursuant to this chapter, or under Chapters 39 or 40 of Title 14 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, whether initiated by or against a housing provider; provided, that:

(1)

One or more members of the tenant organization have standing to assert a claim in their own right;

(2)

One or more members of the tenant organization have provided the tenant organization with written authorization for it to represent that member in the proceeding governing the petition; and

(3)

Neither the claim asserted nor the relief requested requires the participation of the member.

(b)

Where the provisions of subsection (a) of this section have been satisfied, the tenant organization shall be granted party status and have its name placed in the caption of the proceeding.

(c)

No further inquiry into the membership of the association shall be permitted.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 216a
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-226, § 2, 57 DCR 6920